test/src/morphology/N-leeba_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lēba: # Noun 21 'eng /est leib/fin' - full paradigm
     lēba+N+Sg+Nom: lēba
     lēba+N+Sg+Gen: lēba
     lēba+N+Sg+Par: leibõ
     lēba+N+Sg+Dat: lēban
     lēba+N+Sg+Ins: lēbaks
     lēba+N+Sg+Ill: leibõ
     lēba+N+Sg+Ela: lēbast
     lēba+N+Pl+Nom: lēbad
     lēba+N+Pl+Gen: lēbad
     lēba+N+Pl+Par: leibḑi
     lēba+N+Pl+Dat: lēbadõn
     lēba+N+Pl+Ins: lēbadõks
     lēba+N+Pl+Ill: leibži
     lēba+N+Pl+Ela: leibšti
